Maryland, session 2026, HB1006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–103.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (e), (f), and (g) of this section, each public
school under the jurisdiction of a county board:
(1) (i) Shall be open for pupil attendance for at least 180 actual school
days and a minimum of 1,080 school hours during a 10–month period in each school year;
or
(ii) If normal school attendance is prevented because of conditions
described in subsection (b) of this section, shall be open for at least 1,080 hours during a
10–month period;
(2) Shall be open for pupil attendance a minimum of 3 hours during each
school day; and
(3) May not be open on Saturdays, Sundays, or holidays in order to meet
the 180–day or 1,080–hour requirement of this subsection.
(f) (1) In this subsection, “minimal hours of attendance” means the minimum
hours of attendance for the school year required under COMAR 13A.03.02.12, in effect on
July 1, 2025.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE ANNE ARUNDEL
COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION AND THE TALBOT COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION.
(3) Subject to the requirements of this subsection, [the Anne Arundel
County Board of Education] A COUNTY BOARD may elect to operate all of the schools
within the county using a scheduling model that eliminates early dismissal days to allow
for less than 180 school days if the minimal hours of attendance are met.
[(3)] (4) If [the Anne Arundel County Board of Education] A COUNTY
BOARD elects to use a scheduling model that eliminates early dismissal days in accordance
with this subsection, the county board must use the scheduling model for all schools in the
county.

HOUSE BILL 1006 3
[(4)] (5) If [the Anne Arundel County Board of Education] A COUNTY
BOARD uses a scheduling model that results in a school in the county being open for less
than 180 days, the county board shall offer school employees who receive pay at an hourly
rate an opportunity to make up the lost wages through other duties before the beginning of
the next school year.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
7–103.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (e), [and] (f), AND (G) of this section,
each public school under the jurisdiction of a county board:
(1) (i) Shall be open for pupil attendance for at least 180 actual school
days and a minimum of 1,080 school hours during a 10–month period in each school year;
or
(ii) If normal school attendance is prevented because of conditions
described in subsection (b) of this section, shall be open for at least 1,080 hours during a
10–month period;
(2) Shall be open for pupil attendance a minimum of 3 hours during each
school day; and
(3) May not be open on Saturdays, Sundays, or holidays in order to meet
the 180–day or 1,080–hour requirement of this subsection.
(F) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “MINIMAL HOURS OF ATTENDANCE” MEANS
THE MINIMUM HOURS OF ATTENDANCE FOR THE SCHOOL YEAR REQUIRED UNDER
COMAR 13A.03.02.12, IN EFFECT ON JULY 1, 2025.
(2) SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
TALBOT COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION MAY ELECT TO OPERATE ALL OF THE
SCHOOLS WITHIN THE COUNTY USING A SCHEDULING MODEL THAT ELIMINATES
EARLY DISMISSAL DAYS TO ALLOW FOR LESS THAN 180 SCHOOL DAYS IF THE
MINIMAL HOURS OF ATTENDANCE ARE MET.
(3) IF THE TALBOT COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION ELECTS TO USE
A SCHEDULING MODEL THAT ELIMINATES EARLY DISMISSAL DAYS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SUBSECTION, THE COUNTY BOARD MUST USE THE SCHEDULING MODEL
FOR ALL SCHOOLS IN THE COUNTY.

HOUSE BILL 1006
(4) IF THE TALBOT COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION USES A
SCHEDULING MODEL THAT RESULTS IN A SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY BEING OPEN FOR
LESS THAN 180 DAYS, THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL OFFER SCHOOL EMPLOYEES WHO
RECEIVE PAY AT AN HOURLY RATE AN OPPORTUNITY TO MAKE UP THE LOST WAGES
THROUGH OTHER DUTIES BEFORE THE BEGINNING OF THE NEXT SCHOOL YEAR.
[(f)] (G) Publicly funded half–day prekindergarten programs are not subject to
the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
[(g)] (H) Notwithstanding any other law and subject only to this section, each
county board annually shall set the start and end dates of the school year for schools in the
county.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before June 30, 2027, and on or before June 30, 2028, the Talbot County
Board of Education shall report to the State Board of Education and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly on the operation of schools
during the preceding school year that used an alternative scheduling model in accordance
with Sections 1 and 2 of this Act.
(b) The reports required under this section shall include a summary of each day
a school operating under an alternative scheduling model was open and the number of
hours per day that the school was open with students in attendance.
SECTION 4. AND IT BE FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect on the taking effect of the termination provision specified in Section 3 of Chapter 346
of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025. If that termination provision takes effect,
Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect. This Act may not be interpreted to have any
effect on that termination provision.
SECTION 5. AND IT BE FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions in
Section 4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a
period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required
by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.